Utah statutes.
62A-5a-104.   Powers of council.

(1)  The council has authority, after local or individual efforts have failed, to:

(a)  coordinate the appropriate transition of persons with disabilities who receive services and support from one state agency to receive services and support from another state agency;

(b)  coordinate policies governing the provision of services and support for persons with disabilities by state agencies; and

(c)  consider issues regarding eligibility for services and support and, where possible, develop uniform eligibility standards for state agencies.

(2)  The council may receive appropriations from the Legislature to purchase services and supports for persons with disabilities as the council deems appropriate.



Amended by Chapter 167, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 413, 2013 General Session

